Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.080

Naming rights—Use of revenues.

Revenues from the sales of naming rights of a stadium and exhibition center developed under RCW 36.102.050 may only be used for costs associated with capital improvements associated with modernization and maintenance of the stadium and exhibition center. The sales of naming rights are subject to the reasonable approval of the public stadium authority.

[ 1997 c 220 s 107 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]